Autodesk now tracks sales metrics across its entire org
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.pandadoc.com/eu-privacy-rights-addendum/:
EU Privacy Rights Addendum
Table of contents
EU Privacy Rights
Complaints
EU Privacy Rights
If you reside in the European Union (“EU”) or the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the European Union General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”) will apply to how we collect and process your personal information. If you reside in the United Kingdom, the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK GDPR”) will apply to how we collect and process your personal information. Under the GDPR and UK GDPR, EU and UK residents have certain rights with respect to their personal information. You can make the following choices regarding your personal information:
Access to your personal information
. You may request access to your personal information by contacting us at the address described below. If required by law, upon request, we will grant you reasonable access to the personal information that we have about you. We will provide this information in a portable format if required.
Changes to your personal information
. We rely on you to update and correct your personal information. Our website(s) allow you to modify or delete your account profile. If our Website or App does not permit you to update or correct certain information, you may contact us at the address described below in order to request that your information by modified. Note that we may keep historical information in our backup files as permitted by law.
Objections/Restriction to your personal information.
You have the right to object to how personal data is processed in relation to public interest/official authority and our legitimate interests as well as direct marketing purposes – including profiling under both.
You also have the right to request that processing of your personal information be restricted where its accuracy or lawfulness is contested, you need it in response to legal claims or in relation to verification as to whether legitimate interests for processing exist (resulting from objection made under Art 21(1).
Deletion of your personal information
. Typically, we retain your personal information for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this notice, unless a longer retention period is required or permitted by law. Where certain grounds apply, the law authorizes you to make a request that your personal information be deleted and triggers our corresponding obligation to comply, unless exceptions apply.
Move, copy or export personal data.
This is known as the Right of Portability. You have the right to request that your personal data be forwarded to a third party.
Provision/Revocation of Consent
. You have the right to provide or decline consent to the processing of personal information. If you’ve already provided consent, you also have the right to revoke it. This will not impact the legality of processing prior to revocation. If you revoke your consent for the processing of personal information, then we may no longer be able to provide you with services. In some cases, we may deny your request to revoke consent if the law permits or requires us to do so – such as when we are unable to adequately verify your identity. You may revoke consent to processing (where such processing is based upon consent) by contacting us at the address described below.
Complaints
We are committed to resolving valid complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information. For questions or complaints regarding our data use practices or this Privacy Notice, please contact us as provided below. Should you remain unsatisfied with our response to your complaint, you have the right to contact your local data protection authority.
Please note that your rights are not absolute, meaning that in some circumstances, exceptions exist under applicable law. The law may provide exemptions from requests involving your personal data. For example, in order to provide our Services to you, deleting your personal information may prevent you from accessing or using it.
You may exercise these rights
here
. We will respond to any such request in a timely manner as specified by the GDPR. If we need more time to fulfill your request, we will let you know in advance. We will not exceed the legally specified time limit under any circumstance.
Note that, as required by law, we will require you to prove your identity. We may verify your identity by phone call or email. Depending on your request, we will ask for information such as your name or other account information. We may also ask you to provide a signed declaration confirming your identity. Following a request, we will use reasonable efforts to supply, correct or delete personal information about you in our files.
In some circumstances, you may designate an authorized agent to submit requests to exercise certain privacy rights on your behalf. We will require verification that you provided the authorized agent permission to make a request on your behalf. You must provide us with a copy of the signed permission you have given to the authorized agent to submit the request on your behalf and verify your own identity directly with us. If you are an authorized agent submitting a request on behalf of an individual you must attach a copy of the following information to the request:
A completed, signed Authorized Agent Designation form indicating that you have the authorization to act on the consumer’s behalf.
If we do not receive the information, the request will be denied.
Looks like you haven't picked a time for your personalized demo.
Book a time!
We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized content, and analyze web traffic. By clicking “Accept All,” you consent to our use of cookies.
Cookie Notice &
Privacy Notice
Accept All
Reject All
Cookie Settings
Opens in new window
PDF Download
Word Download
Excel Download
PowerPoint Download
Document Download
close carousel
Sub-policy 1
https://www.pandadoc.com/california-privacy-notice-addendum/:
California Privacy Notice Addendum
Table of contents
Your California Privacy Rights
Personal Information We Collect and How We Collect It
Use of Personal Information
Sharing of Personal Information
Rights of California Residents
Verification of Consumer Request and Timeline
Your California Privacy Rights
This section applies only to California residents. Under California Civil Code Sections 1798.83-1798.84, California residents, including California PandaDoc employees and contractors, are entitled to receive: (a) information identifying any third-party companies to whom PandaDoc may have disclosed Personal Information to for direct marketing, within the past year; and (b) a description of the categories of Personal Information disclosed.
To obtain such information, please contact us
here
and we will provide a list of categories of Personal Information disclosed within forty-five (45) days after receiving such a request. This request may be made no more than once per calendar year. We reserve the right not to respond to requests submitted in ways other than those specified above.
Personal Information We Collect and How We Collect It
We collect the type of information described in this California Privacy Notice Addendum and in the
Privacy Notice
, which includes Personal Information and Sensitive Personal Information, in the manner described herein and in the Privacy Notice.
“Personal Information”
means information that identifies, relates to, describes, could reasonably be associated with, or could be reasonably linked directly or indirectly with a particular California consumer or household. Personal Information does not include (i) publicly available information from government records; (ii) deidentified or aggregated consumer information; or (iii) information excluded from the scope of the California Privacy Rights Act (“CPRA”) such as:
health or medical information covered by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and the California Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (CMIA), clinical trial data, or other qualifying research data;
personal information covered by certain sector-specific privacy laws, including the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA), the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA) or California Financial Information Privacy Act (FIPA), the Farm Credit Act, and the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994.
If you do not provide the information that we ask for, we may not be able to provide you with the requested services. Sensitive Personal Information is a subset of Personal Information that requires greater security protections and standards of care in handling.
Sensitive Personal Information under the CPRA is defined as information that if lost, compromised, or disclosed could result in substantial harm, embarrassment, inconvenience, or unfairness to an individual. For more information please
click here
and scroll to the definition of “Sensitive Personal Information.”
We collect Personal Information for the business purposes described in our
Privacy Notice
. The CPRA defines a “business purpose” as the use of Personal Information for the business’s operational purposes, or other notified purposes provided the use of Personal Information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the Personal Information was collected or another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the Personal Information was collected.
The categories of other individuals or entities with whom we may share your Personal Information are listed in our
Privacy Notice
under “Sharing of information”.
We have collected the following categories of Personal Information within the last twelve (12) months:
Category
Information
Data Retention
Identifiers.
First name, last name, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, internet protocol address, email address, email data, website usage data, account name, or other similar identifiers.
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)).
First name, last name, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, internet protocol address, email address, email data, website usage data, account name and login, financial information such as credit and/or debit card, or other similar identifiers. Note, some personal information included in this category may overlap with other categories.
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
We collect protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
This may include age (40 years or older), race, color, ancestry, national origin, citizenship, religion or creed, marital status, medical condition, physical or mental disability, sex (including gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy or childbirth and related medical conditions), sexual orientation, veteran or military status, genetic information (including familial genetic information).
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
Sensitive Personal Information
Credit Card or Debit Card Number; geolocation; account login
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
Commercial information.
Records of services purchased.
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
We collect sensory data.
This may include audio, electronic, visual, or similar information.
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
Internet or other similar network activity.
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer’s interaction with our website.
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
We collect inferences drawn from other Personal Information.
This may include Profile reflecting a person’s preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes.
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
Geolocation data.
Physical location via internet protocol address.
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
Professional or employment-related information.
Current or past job history or performance evaluations, background information.
We retain the information from this Personal Information category for as long as you are our customer and we may maintain an archive copy for audit purposes.
We do not sell the information from this Personal Information category and we do not share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
We obtain the categories of personal information listed above from the following categories of sources:
Directly from you. For example, from forms you complete or products and Services you inquire about or purchase.
Indirectly from you. For example, from observing your actions and interactions with the Services.
Other sources. For example, advertising networks, internet service providers, operating systems and platforms and/ or social networks.
Use of Personal Information
For more information about how we collect your Personal Information, please see the “Types of information we collect” and “Use and processing your information” sections of our
Privacy Notice
.
Sharing Personal Information
We share Personal Information as further described in the “Sharing of Information” section of the
Privacy Notice
. We also explain the categories of third-parties to whom we disclose Personal Information.
Rights of California Residents
If you are a California resident or are a California employee or contractor of PandaDoc, the CPRA provides you with specific rights regarding your Personal Information, subject to certain exceptions.
For instance, we cannot disclose specific pieces of Personal Information if the disclosure would create a substantial, articulable, and unreasonable risk to the security of the Personal Information, your account with us, or the security of our network systems.
These rights are explained below:
Right against Discrimination
. You have the right not to be discriminated against for exercising any of the rights described in this section. We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights.
Right to Access.
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of your Personal Information over the past twelve (12) months. PandaDoc will provide personal information to a consumer upon request a maximum of two times in a 12-month period. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, we will disclose the following to you: (i) the categories of Personal Information we collected about you; (ii) the categories of sources for the Personal Information we collected about you; (iii) the business purpose for collecting (or selling, if applicable) the Personal Information; (iv) the categories of third parties with whom we share such Personal Information; and (v) the specific information we collected about you.
Right to Delete.
You have the right to request that we delete any of your Personal Information we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, we will delete and will direct our service providers to delete your Personal Information from our records, unless an exception applies. Keep in mind, we may deny your request if it is necessary for us or our service providers to: (i) complete the transaction for which we collected the personal information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, fulfill the terms of a written warranty or product recall conducted in accordance with federal law, or otherwise perform services pursuant to our contract with you; (ii) detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities; (iii) debug our website and/or identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality; (iv) exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise another right provided for by law; (v) comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546 et. seq.); (vi) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when the information’s deletion may likely render impossible or seriously impair the research’s achievement, if you previously provided informed consent; (vii) enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us; (viii) make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it; or (xi) comply with a legal obligation.
Right to Correct.
In certain circumstances and upon the receipt of a verifiable consumer request, you have the right to request that PandaDoc correct any inaccurate Personal Information PandaDoc maintains about you. Upon verifying the validity of a verifiable consumer correction request, we will use commercially reasonable efforts to correct your Personal Information as directed, taking into account the nature of the Personal Information and the purposes of maintaining your Personal Information.
Right to Opt-Out of Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Information.
You have the right to opt out of having your Personal Information, including Sensitive Personal Information, sold or shared. PandaDoc does not sell Personal Information or Sensitive Personal Information for monetary or other valuable consideration. If you wish to opt-out of sharing your Personal Information, please
click here
to be redirected to our “
Do Not Share or Sell My Personal Information
” page.
Right to Limit the Use and Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information.
Additionally, you have the right to direct PandaDoc to limit our use of your Sensitive Personal Information to that information which is expected by an average individual as necessary to perform our Services or for your employment. If you wish to limit our use or disclosure of your Sensitive Personal Information, please
click here
to be redirected to our “
Limit the Use of My Sensitive Personal Information.
”
Verification of Consumer Request and Timeline
To assert any of your rights, please contact us as set forth below.
To confirm your identity, it is imperative that we verify the consumer request and so you must provide information that allows us to reasonably verify that you are the person about whom we collected the Personal Information or are an authorized representative. If you make a request on behalf of another person, we will need to verify that you have the authority to do so. You must also describe the request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate and respond to such request. We cannot respond to your request or provide you with Personal Information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the Personal Information relates to you. We will not honor your request if an exception to the law applies.
We will respond to requests within forty-five (45) days after our receipt of such verifiable request (or within such other time as required by applicable law). If we need additional time, we will notify you in writing prior to the expiration of the forty-five (45) day period and inform you of the reason for an additional forty-five (45) day extension of time. For the avoidance of doubt, any such requests for Personal Information will cover the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the date of such verifiable request. Disclosure of Personal Information in response to such a request will be provided in a commonly used format. For more information about requests, please see the “Your rights and controlling your personal information” section of the Privacy Notice.
To exercise any of your rights, please
click here
or you can also send a request in writing to PandaDoc, Inc., Attention: Privacy Department, 3739 Balboa St. #1083, San Francisco, CA 94121. If you are a California resident, employee or contractor and wish to opt-out of sharing your Personal Information or wish to limit the use of your Sensitive Personal Information, please
click here
to be redirected to our “
Do Not Share or Sell My Personal Information
” page.
Looks like you haven't picked a time for your personalized demo.
Book a time!
Opens in new window
PDF Download
Word Download
Excel Download
PowerPoint Download
Document Download
close carousel
Sub-policy 2
https://www.pandadoc.com/brazil-and-canada-privacy-rights-addendum/:
Brazil and Canada Privacy Rights Addendum
Table of contents
Brazil
Canada
Brazil
In addition to the rights listed above for other countries, Customers and users located in Brazil have the right to:
Confirm the existence of processing;
Correct inaccurate or out-of-date information;
Request the anonymization, blocking, or elimination of unnecessary or excessive personal information processed in noncompliance with Brazilian data protection law;
Request the revision of decisions made solely on the basis of automated processing of your personal information whenever they affect your interests;
Obtain information about the entities with which we share your personal information; and
Brazilian residents may ask for a list of third parties that have received your personal information for direct marketing purposes during the previous calendar year. This list also contains the types of personal information shared. We provide this list at no cost. PandaDoc will provide this information within 15 (fifteen) days from the date of your request, respecting our commercial and industrial secrecy. If you are a Brazilian resident and would like to request this information, please contact us
here
.
Canada
Transfers to the U.S. and Third Countries. PandaDoc may transfer your personal information outside of your jurisdiction for further processing where it will be subject to that foreign jurisdiction’s law
Looks like you haven't picked a time for your personalized demo.
Book a time!
We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized content, and analyze web traffic. By clicking “Accept All,” you consent to our use of cookies.
Cookie Notice &
Privacy Notice
Accept All
Reject All
Cookie Settings
Sub-policy 3
https://www.pandadoc.com/virginia-privacy-notice-addendum/:
Virginia Privacy Notice Addendum
Table of contents
Virginia Privacy Rights
Rights of Virginia Consumers
Verification Of Consumer Request and Timeline
Virginia Privacy Rights
This section supplements the
Privacy Notice
and applies only to Virginia residents. If you are a Virginia resident, the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act – Va. Code Ann. §§ 59.1-575 to 59.1-584 (“
VCDPA
”) provides you with specific rights regarding your personal data, subject to certain exceptions. We collect the type of data described in this Virginia Privacy Notice Addendum and in the
Privacy Notice
, which includes personal data and sensitive data, as defined by the VCDPA, in the manner described herein and in the
Privacy Notice
. VCDPA defines “
Personal Data
” as any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable natural person. Personal Data does not include de-identified data or publicly available information. Personal Data that is excluded from the scope of the VCDPA includes:
covered entities or business associates covered by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and related federal laws and regulations, clinical trial data, or other qualifying research data;
personal information covered by certain sector-specific privacy laws, including the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA), the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA) or the Farm Credit Act, and the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994;
information collected from governmental organizations, non-profit organizations and higher education institutions; and
data processed or maintained for employment purposes including emergency contact information or benefits administration.
If you do not provide the information that we ask for, we may not be able to provide you with the requested services. Sensitive data is a category of Personal Data that requires greater security protections and standards of care in handling. “
Sensitive Data”
is defined by the VCDPA as (1) Personal Data revealing racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs, mental or physical health diagnosis, sexual orientation, or citizenship or immigration status; (2) the processing of genetic or biometric data for the purpose of uniquely identifying a natural person; (3) the personal data collected from a known child; or (4) precise geolocation data. Subject to
limited exceptions
, we will only process your Sensitive Data with your consent.
Rights Of Virginia Consumers
If you are a Virginia resident the VCDPA provides you with specific rights regarding your Personal Data, subject to certain exceptions. These rights are explained below:
Right against Retaliation or Discrimination
. You have the right not to be retaliated or discriminated against for exercising any of the rights described in this section. We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights.
Right to Access.
Subject to certain exceptions, you have the right to confirm whether we are processing your data and you have the right to access such Personal Data.
Right to Delete.
You have the right to request that we delete any of the Personal Data we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, we will delete and will direct our service providers to delete your Personal Data from our records, unless an exception applies. Please
click here
to learn more about the limitations that may apply to your request.
Right to Correct.
In certain circumstances and upon the receipt of a verifiable consumer request, you have the right to request that PandaDoc correct any inaccurate Personal Data PandaDoc maintains about you. Upon verifying the validity of a verifiable consumer correction request, we will use commercially reasonable efforts to correct your Personal Data as directed, taking into account the nature of the Personal Data and the purposes of maintaining your Personal Data.
Right to Opt-Out of Sale or Use of Your Personal Data for Targeted Advertisement.
You have the right to opt-out of having your Personal Data, including Sensitive Data, sold and/ or used for targeted advertising. For clarity, PandaDoc does not sell Personal Data or Sensitive Data for monetary consideration. If you wish to opt-out of selling of your Personal Data, please click here to be redirected to our “
Do Not Sell My Personal Data
” page.
Right to Data Portability.
You have the right to obtain a copy of your Personal Data that you previously provided to us in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the data to another controller without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means.
Verification Of Consumer Request and Timeline
To assert your rights, please contact us as set forth below.
To confirm your identity, it is imperative that we verify the consumer request and so you must provide information that allows us to reasonably verify that you are the person about whom we collected the Personal Data or are an authorized representative. If you make a request on behalf of another person, we will need to verify that you have the authority to do so. You must also describe the request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate and respond to such request. We cannot respond to your request or provide you with Personal Data if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the Personal Data relates to you. We will not honor your request if an exception to the law applies.
We will respond to requests within forty-five (45) days after our receipt of such verifiable request (or within such other time as required by applicable law). If we need additional time, we will notify you in writing prior to the expiration of the forty-five (45) day period and inform you of the reason for an additional forty-five (45) day extension of time. For the avoidance of doubt, any such requests for Personal Data will cover the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the date of such verifiable request and such requests can be made up to twice annually per consumer. Disclosure of Personal Data in response to such a request will be provided free of charge and in a commonly used format. For more information about requests, please see the “Your rights and controlling your personal information” section of the Privacy Notice.
To exercise any of your rights, please
click here
or you can also send a request in writing to PandaDoc, Inc., Attention: Privacy Department, 3739 Balboa St. #1083, San Francisco, CA 94121.
To exercise your personal privacy rights, please click below for the applicable location:
EU (GDPR and UK GDPR) and the rest of the world
California, USA
Brazil
Within sixty (60) days of receipt of your appeal, we will inform you in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to your appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If the appeal is denied, you may also contact the Attorney General
here
to submit a complaint.
Looks like you haven't picked a time for your personalized demo.
Book a time!
Sub-policy 4
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/7318509?hl=en:
Skip to main content
Privacy Disclosures Policy
When you use Google Analytics on your site or application, you must disclose the use of Google Analytics and how it collects and processes data.
For more information, see:
Google's Privacy & Terms
Safeguarding your data
Give feedback about this article
Choose a section to give feedback on
Was this helpful?
How can we improve it?
Yes
No
Submit
Post to the help community
Get answers from community members
Contact us
Tell us more and we’ll help you get there
true
Help
1 of 18
Data privacy and security
2 of 18
Analytics service status
3 of 18
Supported browsers
4 of 18
Available languages
5 of 18
Analytics policies
6 of 18
Analytics APIs
7 of 18
How Google Analytics secures your web traffic
8 of 18
[GA4] Data collection
9 of 18
Regional data collection
10 of 18
Privacy Disclosures Policy
11 of 18
Google Measurement Controller-Controller Data Protection Terms
12 of 18
U.S. State Privacy Laws Controller Addendum to Google Measurement Controller-Controller Data Protection Terms
13 of 18
Shared Data Under Measurement Controller-Controller Data Protection Terms
14 of 18
Policy Requirements for Phone Analytics
15 of 18
Prepare for Apple's App Store data-disclosure requirements
16 of 18
Prepare for Google Play’s data disclosure requirements
17 of 18
Prepare your app for Android changes
18 of 18
Updates to iOS 14+ campaign measurement
Choose your own learning path
Check out
google.com/analytics/learn
, a new resource to help you get the most out of Google Analytics 4. The new website includes videos, articles, and guided flows, and provides links to the Google Analytics Discord, Blog, YouTube channel, and GitHub repository.
Start learning today!
3058214033539396243
true
Search
Clear search
Close search
Main menu
Google apps
Search Help Center
true
true
true
Google Help
Help Center
Get started with Analytics
Collect and manage data
Report and explore
Advertising and attribution
Audiences and remarketing
Manage accounts, properties, and users
Google Analytics 360
Migrate from UA to GA4 [Legacy]
Policies and data privacy
Community
Analytics
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Submit feedback
Introduction to Analytics
Set up Analytics
Guides and videos
Troubleshoot
Glossary
Events and key events
Import data from external systems
Integrations
Measure ecommerce
Measure lead generation
[GA4] First-party data
Reports
Explorations
Dimensions and metrics
Analytics Intelligence
The Analytics app
How data is stored and displayed
Regular expressions [Legacy]
Understand advertising
Understand attribution
Manage and configure attribution
iOS conversion measurement
[GA4] Set up audiences
[GA4] Use audiences for advertising and remarketing
[GA4] Audiences for common marketing objectives
[GA4] Troubleshoot audiences
[GA4] Subproperties
[GA4] Roll-up properties
[GA4] Subproperties
[GA4] Roll-up properties
How data is stored and displayed
Data privacy and security
true
true
69256
false
false
Inaccurate - doesn't match what I see in the product
Hard to understand - unclear or translation is wrong
Missing info - relevant but not comprehensive
Irrelevant - doesn’t match the title and / or my expectations
Minor errors - formatting issues, typos, and / or broken links
Other suggestions - ideas to improve the content
Share additional info or suggestions
​
​
Do not share any personal info
Cancel
Submit
By continuing, you agree Google uses your answers,
account & system info
to improve services, per our
Privacy
&
Terms
.
false
Sub-policy 5
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 6
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 7
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 8
https://www.pandadoc.com/privacy-notice:
Master Services Agreement
Security Practices
PandaDoc Data Residency
Cookie Notice
Data Processing Agreement
Privacy Notice
PandaDoc’s Subprocessors
GDPR
Acceptable Use Policy
Developer Agreement
Request SOC2 Type 2 Report
Terms of Service
Master Services Agreement
Security Practices
Privacy
PandaDoc Data Residency
Cookie Notice
Data Processing Agreement
Privacy Notice
PandaDoc's Subprocessors
GDPR
Policies
Acceptable Use Policy
Other Agreement
Developer Agreement
Miscellaneous
Request SOC2 Type 2 Report
Legal
Privacy Notice
Privacy Notice
Updated: September 19, 2023
Table of contents
About us
About this Privacy Notice
Third-Party Websites and Services
Types of Information We Collect
Information You Provide Us
Information Collected via Technology
Use and Processing of Personal Information
Use of Non-Personal Information
Sharing of Your Personal Information
Retention of Your Personal Information
How We Protect Your Personal Information
International Data Transfers
EU-UK Extension/Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Participation
Children and Minors
Accessibility
Changes to our Privacy Notice
Contacting us
EU Privacy Rights Addendum
CA Privacy Rights Addendum
Brazil and Canada Privacy Rights Addendum
VA Privacy Rights Addendum
About us
We are a global company based in San Francisco, California, USA. We provide documentation automation software as a service that helps companies streamline processes to create, approve and eSign proposals, quotes, contracts, and other documents. Companies that use our services can provide their customers with a more professional, timely, and engaging experience.
About this Privacy Notice
This Privacy Notice sets forth the handling practices of PandaDoc, Inc. (variously, “
PandaDoc
”, “
we
”, “
our
” or “
us
”) and its affiliates in regard to the collection, use and disclosure of personal data or personal information that you may provide to us through using this website (
www.pandadoc.com
) (the “
Website
”), by using any product or by using any service, including but not limited to the PandaDoc software-as-a-service product (“
SaaS
”), downloading, accessing and /or using PandaDoc’s mobile application named PandaDoc (“
App
”), creating an account, interacting with us, opting-in to receive SMS mobile messages, or engaging with any other websites, pages, features, or content we own, operate and/or provide (collectively with the Website, SaaS and App, the “
Services
”).
If you do not accept this Privacy Notice and/or do not meet and/or comply with the provisions set forth herein, then you should not use the Services.
By accepting our Privacy Notice, accessing and using the Services, you consent to our collection, storage, use, and disclosure of your personal data or personal information as described in this Privacy Notice and the Cookie Notice located at https://www.pandadoc.com/cookie-notice/ (“Cookie Notice”). The use of www.pandadoc.com and the App is subject to PandaDoc’s Terms of Service located at https://www.pandadoc.com/terms-of-use/.
Third-Party Websites and Services
In some instances, we may process your personal information in accordance with an agreement with a third party.  This may occur, for example, when you sign-in or sign-up for the Services through a third-party or click on a third-party link. In this instance, the terms of the third-party’s agreement and privacy notice will govern how your personal information is processed. You should review the terms and notices of any third-party websites prior to clicking on the links. PandaDoc has no control over the privacy practices of websites or applications that we do not own. We are not responsible for the practices employed by any websites and/or services linked to and/or from our Website, including the information and/or content contained therein. Please also remember that when you use a link to go from our Website to another website and/or service, our Privacy Notice does not apply to such third-party websites and/or services. Your browsing and interaction on any third-party website and/or service, including those that have a link on our Website, are subject to such third-party’s own rules and policies. In addition, you agree that we are not responsible and do not have control over any third-parties that you authorize to access your personal information. If you are using a third-party website and/or service and you allow them to access your personal information, you do so at your own risk.
Types of Information We Collect
We collect “Non-Personal Information” and “Personal Information” and the information we collect from you depends on how you use the Services. “Non-Personal Information” includes information that cannot be used to personally identify you, such as anonymous usage data, general demographic information we may collect, referring/exit pages and URLs, platform types, preferences you submit, and preferences that are generated based on the data you submit and a number of clicks. “Personal Information” means data that allows someone to identify or contact you, including, for example, your name, address, telephone number, and email address, as well as any other non-public information about you that is associated with or linked to any of the foregoing data. The following provides examples of the type of information that we collect from you and how we use that information.
Context
Types of data
Primary purpose for collection
and use of data
Client information
We collect the name, username, and contact information, of our clients and their employees with whom we may interact.
We have a legitimate interest in contacting our clients and communicating with them concerning normal business administration such as projects, services, and billing.
Client user account information
We collect personal information from our clients when they create an account to access and use the Services. or request certain free Services from our Website. This information could include business contact information such as name, email address, IP address, geolocation, title, company information, industry, and password for our Services.
We have a legitimate interest in providing account-related functionalities to our users, monitoring account log-ins, and detecting potential fraudulent logins or account misuse. Additionally, we use this information to fulfill our contract to provide you with Services.
14-day free trial and/or free e-sign account
We collect personal information from our clients when they request a 14-day free trial or free e-sign account from our Website. This Personal Information includes name, IP address, geolocation, and business contact information such as email address, title, and password for your PandaDoc account.  Clients may also provide a credit card number or other billing details.
We have a legitimate interest in providing account-related functionalities to our users, monitoring account log-ins, and detecting potential fraudulent logins or account misuse. Additionally, we use this information to facilitate ease of account creation if a user chooses to purchase the service during or immediately following a free trial period.
Contact information of vendors
Users of our Service may ask their vendors or service providers to submit company and security-related information on our platform (e.g., to complete a security questionnaire). When a user invites a vendor we collect the name and email address of the vendor.
We have a legitimate interest in contacting vendors on behalf of our clients in order to invite them to communicate with companies through our platform. Among other things, the communication allows our clients to efficiently solicit, and receive, security questionnaires, and allows vendors to efficiently solicit, and transmit security questionnaires. Additionally, we use this information to fulfill our contract to provide Services which may include soliciting, receiving, transmitting, and hosting responses to security questions.
Account information — vendors
We collect personal information from vendors when they create an account to access and use the Services or request certain free Services from our Website. This information could include business contact information such as name, email address, title, company information, and password for our Services.
We have a legitimate interest in providing account-related functionalities to our vendor users, monitoring account log-ins, and detecting potential fraudulent logins or account misuse. Additionally, in some cases, we use this information to fulfill our contract to provide vendor-users with Services.
Cookies and first-party tracking
We use pixels, beacons, cookies, and clear GIFs. “Cookies” are small pieces of information that a website sends to a computer’s hard drive while a website is viewed. See our
Cookie Notice
for further information.
We have a legitimate interest in making our website operate efficiently.
Cookies and third-party tracking
We participate in behavior-based advertising, this means that a third party uses technology (
e.g.,
a cookie) to collect information about your use of our website so that they can provide advertising about products and services tailored to your interests on our website, or on other websites.
To learn more about our third-party partners, please read their respective privacy policies. Google Analytics is an analytics service provided by Google LLC. (US).:
Privacy Disclosures Policy
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Safeguarding your data
You may opt-out of Google Analytics for display advertising or customize Google display network ads by managing your privacy controls on Google’s website. Looker Analytics is a business intelligence tool that we use and this service is provided by Google LLC (US):
Privacy Policy – Privacy & Terms – Google
See our Cookie Preference Center for more information.
We have a legitimate interest in understanding our users and providing tailored services. Non-essential/non-service provider cookies will not be deployed until opt-in consent is obtained.
For individuals that expressly consent, we may engage in behavior-based advertising, capturing Website, SaaS, and mobile application analytics, and engaging third parties to assist with providing Services that are tailored to your interests. See our Cookie Notice for more information on how we use Cookies.
Demographic information
We use IP information to 1). Ensure the legality of our documents (under eSignature law); 2). Understand how user behavior varies in different locations in order to improve our software; 3.) Depending on location, provide better support and success service.
We have a legitimate interest in ensuring that our product/service is legal and providing tailored services based on the location (Country) – such as appropriate 1) support, 2) contract content, and 3) templates. IP information will not be used for behavioral purposes absent explicit consent.
Email interconnectivity
If you receive email from us, we use certain tools to capture data related to when you open our message, click on any links or banners it contains and make purchases.
If you choose to connect your Gmail account to PandaDoc, we collect personal data such as name, IP address and Gmail account address to enable the functionality of displaying the Gmail account address to your chosen recipients. PandaDoc’s use and transfer of information received from Google APIs to any other app will adhere to
Google API Services User Data Policy
, including the Limited Use requirements.
We have a legitimate interest in understanding how you interact with our communications to you. Such data capture will only be deployed following receipt of explicit consent.
Explicit user consent is captured when a user chooses to connect their Gmail account; PandaDoc has a legitimate interest in improving the functionality of our platform.
Employment
When you apply for a job posting or become an employee or contractor, we collect information necessary to process your application or to retain you as an employee or contractor. This may include, among other things, your Social Security Number, diversity or demographic information, including race or ethnicity, gender or gender identity, and veteran or disability status. Providing this information is required for employment.
We use information about current employees to perform our contract of employment or the anticipation of a contract of employment with you. In some contexts, we are also required by law to collect information about our employees. We also have a legitimate interest in using your information to have efficient staffing and workforce operations and provide the Website, the Services, and App to our clients.
Feedback/Support
We collect Personal Information from you contained in any inquiry you submit to us regarding our Website or Services, such as completing our online forms, calling, or emailing for the purposes of general inquiries, support requests, or to report an issue. When you communicate with us over the phone or over a video-call platform, your calls may be recorded and sent to you as a support measure. These calls may also be analyzed for training, quality control, and for sales and marketing purposes by PandaDoc. During such calls we will notify you of the recording via either voice prompt or script. We may collect sensory information such as audio and visual image.
We have a legitimate interest in receiving, and acting upon, your feedback, issues, or inquiries.
Mailing list
When you sign up for one of our mailing lists, we collect your email address along with your first and last name.
We share information about our products and services with individuals that consent to receive such information. We also have a legitimate interest in sharing information about our products or services.
Marketing data
When you subscribe to one of our mailing list(s) or opt into our SMS feature, we collect your email address, telephone number (if applicable) along with your first and last name (and/or user name provided).
We share information about our products and services with individuals that consent to receive such information. We also have a legitimate interest in sharing information about our products or services.
Mobile device data
We collect information from your mobile device when visiting our Website. Such information may include operating system type and/or mobile device model, browser type, domain, and other system settings, the language your system uses and the country and time zone of your device, geo-location, unique device identifier and/or other device identifier, mobile phone carrier identification, and device software platform and firmware information.
We have a legitimate interest in identifying unique visitors, and in understanding how users interact with us on their mobile devices.
Order placement
Subsequent to Service enrollment (where we collect name, email and phone number, job role, company name and size), to place an order, we collect billing address, and credit or debit card details.
We use your information to perform our contract to provide you with products or services.
SMS messaging
When you opt into receive notices to execute documents via SMS messages we collect your first and last name along with your telephone number.
We collect this information based on user’s opt-in consent.  We also use this information to fulfill our contractual duty to our Customers.
Social Media Connectors
Our Website uses social media connectors. They are social media buttons, such as LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter, Instagram and YouTube, you see on our Website that allow you to connect and learn more about us and interact with us, our users and marketing partners.
We may engage in behavior-based advertising, capturing website and mobile application analytics and engaging third parties to assist with providing services that may be of interest to you.
Transactional Data/Event Data
Names and email addresses of parties to a transaction, subject line, history of actions individuals take related to a transaction (i.e. sign and forward features) and personal information about those individuals or their devices, such as name, IP address, email address and other authentication methods.
We use this information to fulfill our contractual duties to our Customers. We also have a legitimate interest in creating and maintaining an audit trail proving the authenticity and legality of signatures and documents created by PandaDoc.
Surveys
When you participate in a survey we collect information that you provide through the survey. If the survey is provided by a third party service provider, the third party’s privacy policy applies to the collection, use, and disclosure of your information. Participation in any such surveys is completely voluntary and you therefore have a choice whether to disclose such information.
We have a legitimate interest in understanding your opinions, and collecting information relevant to our organization.
Usage Data
Such as referring and exit pages and URLs, domain names, landing pages and content viewed and the order of those pages, the amount of time spent on particular pages, the frequency of your use of our Services and other related information.
We have a legitimate interest in understanding how you interact with our website to better improve it, and to understand your preferences and interests in order to select offerings that you might find most useful. We also have a legitimate interest in detecting and preventing fraud
Website interactions
We use technology to monitor how you interact with our website. This may include which links you click on, or information that you type into our online forms. This may also include information about your device or browser.
We have a legitimate interest in understanding how you interact with our website to better improve it, and to understand your preferences and interests in order to select offerings that you might find most useful. We also have a legitimate interest in detecting and preventing fraud.
Web logs
We collect information, including your browser type, operating system, Internet Protocol (IP) address (a number that is automatically assigned to a computer when the Internet is used), domain name, click-activity, referring website, and/or a date/time stamp for visitors.
We have a legitimate interest in monitoring our networks and the visitors to our Website and App as well as the access and use of the Services to enhance the Services. Web logs also help us understand which of our services is the most popular.
User Content
When you use PandaDoc, we collect Personal Information that is included in the input, file uploads, and other materials uploaded to your workspace.
We use this information to fulfill our contractual duties to our Customers.
In addition to the information that we collect from you directly, we may also receive information about you from other sources, including third parties, business partners, our affiliates, or publicly available sources. For example, if you submit a job application, or become an employee, we may conduct a background check.
Information You Provide Us
We collect Personal Information from you such as your role/title, first and last name, e-mail, mailing address, phone, password when you choose to subscribe to our Services/ set up an account through the Services.
When you engage us to provide Services, our payment processor will collect all information necessary to complete the transaction, including your name, company name, credit card information, billing information, and direct deposit/ ACH information.
If you provide us feedback or contact us via email, we may collect your name, if stated, and email address, as well as any other content included in the email, in order to send you a reply.
When you participate in one of our surveys, we may collect additional information that you knowingly provide.
We will maintain the information you send via email in accordance with applicable federal law.
In compliance with the CAN-SPAM Act, all emails sent from our organization will clearly state who the email is from and provide clear information on how to contact the sender. In addition, all email messages will also contain concise information on how to remove yourself from our mailing list so that you receive no further e-mail communication from us.
If you connect your Gmail account to the PandaDoc application, we collect your Gmail account address, IP address, and name to enable this functionality. When you use PandaDoc, we collect Personal Information that is included in the input, file uploads, and other materials uploaded to your workspace, this is also known as User Content.
If you opt in to our SMS messaging services (marketing or document notifications), you provide us with your name and telephone number and we collect such Personal Information to fulfill our contractual duties to you.
Information Collected via Technology
In an effort to improve the quality of the Services, we reserve the right to track information provided to us by your browser or by our software application when you view or use the Services, such as the website you came from (known as the “referring URL”), the type of browser you use, the device from which you connected to the Services, the time and date of access, and other information that does not personally identify you. We track this information using Cookies. Cookies are sent to a user’s browser from our servers and are stored on the user’s computer hard drive or mobile device. Sending a Cookie to a user’s browser enables us to collect Non-Personal Information about that user and keep a record of the user’s preferences when utilizing our Services, both on an individual and aggregate basis. Please review the
Cookie Notice
for more information.
We may also use third-party analytics services such as Google Analytics to collect information about how you use and interact with our Services. Such third-party analytics services may use Cookies to gather information such as the pages you visited, your IP address, a date/time stamp for your visit and which website referred you to the Website, SaaS or App.
We reserve the right to use technological equivalents of Cookies, including social media, beacons or pixels. These pixels allow social media sites to track visitors to outside websites so as to tailor advertising messages users see while visiting that social media website. We reserve the right to use these pixels in compliance with the policies of the various social media sites.
Some content or applications, including advertisements, on the Services are served by third-parties, including advertisers, ad networks and servers, content providers, and application providers. These third-parties may use Cookies alone or in conjunction with web beacons or other tracking technologies to collect information about you when you use our Services. The information they collect may be associated with your personal information or they may collect information, including personal information, about your online activities over time and across different websites and other online services. They may use this information to provide you with interest-based (behavioral) advertising or other targeted content. We do not control these third-parties’ tracking technologies or how they may be used and we are not liable for any third-party providers, acts or omissions. If you have any questions about an advertisement or other targeted content, you should contact the third-party provider directly.
Use and Processing of Personal Information
In addition to the purposes and uses described above, we use information in the following ways:
To identify you when you visit our Website or App.
To create your account on the Website, SaaS and/or App and maintain your relationship with us (providing you with requested information and communicating with you)
To provide our Services including to send you records of our relationship, including for purchases and other requests.
To improve our Services and offerings including test Services and test changes in our Services and to develop new products or features.
To manage the security of our Website and Services, including support systems.
To conduct analytics for example to create and review data about our users and how they utilize our Services.
To record details about transactions with our Services involving electronic signatures (e.g. who initiated, viewed, or signed documents; signer’s IP addresses; timestamps)
To respond to inquiries related to support, employment opportunities, or other requests.
To send marketing and promotional materials including information relating to our products, services, sales, or promotions, or those of our business partners.
To provide you with and collect payment for the Services and products requested
To comply with legal obligation, including legal retention periods
To defend or exercise our rights in legal claims
Although the sections above describe our primary purpose in collecting your information, in many situations we have more than one purpose. For example, if you sign up for Services, we may collect your information to complete that transaction, but we also collect your information as we have a legitimate interest in maintaining your information after your transaction is complete so that we can quickly and easily respond to any questions about your Services. As a result, our collection and processing of your information is based in different contexts upon your consent, our need to perform a contract, our obligations under law, and/or our legitimate interest in conducting our business.
Use of Non-Personal Information
In general, we use non-personal information to help us improve the Services and customize the user experience. We also aggregate non-personal information in order to track trends and analyze use patterns on the Services. This Privacy Notice does not limit in any way our use or disclosure of non-personal information and we reserve the right to use and disclose such non-personal information to our partners, advertisers and other third parties at our discretion.
Sharing of Your Personal Information
In addition to the specific situations discussed elsewhere in this policy, we may share personal information in the following situations:
Affiliates and acquisitions
. We may share information with our corporate affiliates (
e.g
., parent company, sister companies, subsidiaries, joint ventures, or other companies under common control). If another company acquires, or plans to acquire, our company, business, or our assets, we will also share information with that company, including at the negotiation stage.
Other disclosures with your consent.
We may ask if you would like us to share your information with other unaffiliated third parties who are not described elsewhere in this policy.
Other disclosures without your consent
. We may disclose information in response to subpoenas, warrants, or court orders, or in connection with any legal process, or to comply with relevant laws. We may also share your information in order to establish or exercise our rights, to defend against a legal claim, to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding possible illegal activities, suspected fraud, safety of person or property, or a violation of our policies, or to comply with your request for the shipment of products to or the provision of services by a third-party intermediary.
Public
. Some of our websites may provide the opportunity to post comments, or reviews, in a public forum. If you decide to submit information on these pages, that information may be publicly available.
Service providers
. We share your information with service providers. Among other things service providers help us to administer our website, send e-mail communications, conduct surveys, provide technical support, detect fraud, process payments, and assist in the fulfillment of orders. Our service providers will be given access to your personal information as is reasonably necessary to provide the Website and related Services. Our service providers are contractually obligated to use your personal information only at our direction and in accordance with our Privacy Notice; to handle your personal information in confidence; and to not disclose your personal information to unauthorized third parties. Service providers who violate these obligations are subject to appropriate discipline including, but not limited to, termination as a service provider.
Except as otherwise stated in this Privacy Notice, we do not sell, trade, rent or otherwise share for marketing purposes your personal information with third-parties without your consent.
Retention of Your Personal Information
The length of time for which we retain personal information depends on the purposes for which we collected and use it and/or as required to comply with applicable laws. We keep your personal information for no longer than necessary for the purposes for which it was collected and/or processed. Where there are technical limitations that prevent deletion or anonymization, we safeguard personal information and limit active use of it.
See the Section “Your choices” about storage of your personal information.
How We Protect Your Personal Information
We implement security measures designed to protect your personal information from unauthorized access. We apply these tools based on the sensitivity of the personal information we collect, use, and store, and the current state of technology. We protect your personal information through technical and organizational security measures to minimize risks associated with data loss, misuse, unauthorized access, and unauthorize disclosure and alteration. We periodically review our information collection, storage and processing practices, including technical and organizational measures, to guard against unauthorized access to systems. Any account you have on our Website, SaaS or App is protected by your account password and we urge you to take steps to keep your personal information safe by not disclosing your password and by logging out of your account after each use.
Because the internet is not a completely secure environment, PandaDoc cannot warrant the security of any information you transmit to PandaDoc or guarantee that information on the Website may not be accessed, disclosed, altered and/or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical and/or managerial safeguards. In addition, while we take reasonable measure to ensure that service providers keep your information confidential and secure, such service provider’s practices are ultimately beyond our control.
We are not responsible for the functionality, privacy and/or security measures of any other organization. By using our Website, you acknowledge that you understand and agree to assume these risks. To exercise your personal privacy rights, please click below for the applicable location:
EU (GDPR and UK GDPR) and the rest of the world
California, USA
Brazil
Your Choices
You may take the below actions to change or limit the collection or use of your Personal Information.
Promotional/Marketing emails
. You may choose to provide us with your email address for the purpose of allowing us to send free newsletters, surveys, offers, and other promotional/marketing materials to you, as well as targeted offers from third parties. You can stop receiving promotional/marketing emails by following the unsubscribe instructions in e-mails that you receive and also adjust your email preferences here:.
Email Preferences
as well as your communication preferences here:
Communication Preferences
. If you decline to receive promotional and/or marketing emails, we may still send you transactional and service-related messages.
Device and usage information.
If you do not want us to see your device location, you can turn off location sharing on your device, change your device privacy settings, or decline to share location on your browser.
Deletion Of Your Personal Information.
Typically, we retain your personal information for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Notice, unless a longer retention period is required or permitted by law, or as otherwise described in this Privacy Notice. You may, however, request information about how long we keep a specific type of information, or request that we delete your personal information by contacting us at the address below. If required by law we will grant a request to delete information, but you should note that in many situations we must keep your personal information to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, enforce our agreements, or for another one of our business purposes.
Deleting your In-App account
. If you decide to delete your in-App account, you may do so by selecting “Delete Account” on your profile page. Deleting your PandaDoc account in-App will:
Sign you out immediately
Remove or anonymize any identifiable user information
International Data Transfers
Our company operates globally and has a global infrastructure. We utilize cloud computing which means your personal data may be transferred to a country with data protection laws not as strong as where you reside. We will transfer your Personal Data to countries deemed having adequate levels of data protection as determined by the European Commission.
PandaDoc may rely on data processing agreements (DPAs) with attached standard contractual clauses (SCCs) approved by the European Commission or other appropriate solutions to address cross-border transfers as required or permitted by Articles 46 and 49 of the GDPR. Where required by such laws, you may request a copy of the suitable mechanisms we have in place by contacting us.
EU-UK Extension/Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Participation
PandaDoc complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework program (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework program (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. PandaDoc is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC). PandaDoc is an active Privacy Shield participant and as such is automatically covered by the DPF framework until October 10, 2023.  PandaDoc has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  PandaDoc has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework program Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Although PandaDoc does not sell personal data, in the context of an onward transfer to a third-party such as a business partner (“third-party agent”), PandaDoc shall remain liable under DPF Principles if such third-party agent processes any personal data in a manner inconsistent with DPF principles, unless PandaDoc can prove that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
In compliance with the EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles, PandaDoc commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, Swiss and United Kingdom individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact PandaDoc. To exercise your personal privacy rights, please click below for the applicable location:
EU (GDPR and UK GDPR) and the rest of the world
California, USA
Brazil
PandaDoc is committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2
Children and Minors
PandaDoc does not knowingly collect personal data from children under the age of thirteen (13). If we learn that we have collected Personal Information from a child under age thirteen (13), we will delete such information as quickly as possible. To exercise your personal privacy rights, please click below for the applicable location:
EU (GDPR and UK GDPR) and the rest of the world
California, USA
Brazil
By using the Services, you represent that you are at least eighteen (18) years old and understand that you must be at least eighteen (18) years old in order to create an account and/or purchase the goods and/or services through the Website.
Accessibility
If you are visually impaired, you may access this notice through your browser’s audio reader.
Changes to our Privacy Notice
In general, changes will be made to this Privacy Notice to address new or modified laws and/or new or modified business procedures. However, we may update this Privacy Notice at any time, with or without advance notice, so please review it periodically. We may provide you additional forms of notice of modifications and/or updates as appropriate under the circumstances. Your continued use of the Website after any modification to this Privacy Notice will constitute your acceptance of such modifications and/or updates. You can determine when this Privacy Notice was last revised by referring to the date it was last “Updated” above.
Contacting us
For questions or complaints regarding our use of your personal information or Privacy Notice, please contact us at PandaDoc, Inc., Attention: Privacy Department, 3739 Balboa St. #1083, San Francisco, CA 94121. To exercise your personal privacy rights, please click below for the applicable location:
EU (GDPR and UK GDPR) and the rest of the world
California, USA
Brazil
Looks like you haven't picked a time for your personalized demo.
Book a time!